Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Chapter 7

Regional Development Authorities — Greater Nashville Regional Council

64-7-101. Creation — Purpose.

There is hereby created and established the Greater Nashville regional council, being a public body corporate and politic created on behalf of the counties of Cheatham, Davidson, Dickson, Houston, Humphreys, Montgomery, Robertson, Rutherford, Stewart, Sumner, Trousdale, Williamson and Wilson and all incorporated municipalities and metropolitan governments located within these counties.

The general assembly hereby finds that it is necessary and desirable to create and establish the Greater Nashville regional council and empower the regional council with the duties, powers and authority set forth in this chapter, based in part on the finding of the general assembly as follows:

The local governments comprising the regional council have experienced and are projected to experience continued rapid growth of residential, commercial and industrial development, which growth mandates coordination of planning, economic development and projects by and between local governments;

This growth results in part from the location of major national and international industries and manufacturing facilities within the region, including support and corollary industries;

The local governments within the region must plan, finance and implement projects, such as construction and upgrading of roads, highways and infrastructure as a direct result of increased demand attributable to growth within the region, much of which crosses local government jurisdictional boundaries; and

It is in furtherance of the public policy of the state to create the regional council for the purpose of assuring continued growth and development in a manner that will preserve, protect and enhance the special quality of life indigenous to Tennessee. It is the further intent of the general assembly that the provisions and intent of this chapter be liberally construed.

The regional council established pursuant to this chapter supersedes and is established in lieu of the Mid-Cumberland development district, previously established pursuant to the “Development District Act of 1965,” compiled in title 13, chapter 14, and the Mid-Cumberland council of governments established by agreement of the local governments pursuant to the “Interlocal Cooperation Act,” compiled in title 12, chapter 9. It is the intent and purpose of the general assembly to establish the regional council with the powers and duties set forth in this chapter, in lieu of and in substitution of the Mid-Cumberland development district and Mid-Cumberland council of governments. All funding provided to the Mid-Cumberland development district pursuant to § 13-14-111 shall now and hereafter be provided to the regional council in the amount and manner as set forth in § 13-14-111.

The regional council is created and established for the purpose of regional planning, economic development and interlocal agreements and cooperation for the geographical area embracing the above counties and incorporated municipalities located therein, referred to as the “region” in this chapter.

The regional council's role in regional planning, economic development and interlocal agreements and cooperation includes the coordination of these activities and programs with those of other federal, state and local planning and development agencies.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The reference in this section to the Mid-Cumberland development district appears to be in error as §13-14-111 refers to the Upper Cumberland development district not the Mid-Cumberland development district.

64-7-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

“Comprehensive plan or general plan” means a general, broad-based long range plan or document that formulates policies and proposals to guide the growth and development of a local government. Such plans address functional elements, including, but not limited to, future land use, improvements to transportation systems, community facilities and infrastructure, as well as providing a capital improvements program and budget for implementation of these proposed improvements;

“Infrastructure” means the basic network of public utilities and access facilities that support and promote land development. Water and sewerage system elements, storm drainage systems, roads, streets and highways, public transportation, pedestrian and bicycle facilities, railroads, gas and electric transmission lines, telecommunications networks and solid waste disposal sites and similar public facilities shall be included in this definition;

“Local government or governments” means Cheatham, Davidson, Dickson, Houston, Humphreys, Montgomery, Robertson, Rutherford, Stewart, Sumner, Trousdale, Williamson and Wilson counties and all incorporated municipalities and metropolitan governments located within these counties;

“Public agency” means the regional council, any political subdivision of this state, any agency of the state government or of the United States and any political subdivision of another state;

“Regional council” means the greater Nashville regional council created by this chapter; and

“Regional impact project” means:

Any commercial, residential, industrial, recreational or public facility building or development, the construction or expansion of which is proposed to be located in more than one (1) local government jurisdiction and/or where the construction or expansion of the building or development is expected by the local government or by the regional council to have infrastructure impacts upon two (2) or more government jurisdictions; and

Upon determination that the proposed location, construction or expansion of a building or development is expected by the local government or by the regional council to have infrastructure impacts upon two (2) or more local government jurisdictions, additional quantitative measures are provided in this chapter for general reference in the determination of regional impact projects, and are not all inclusive, but shall include any:

Commercial or industrial building or development aggregating two hundred fifty thousand square feet (250,000 sq. ft.) or more of floor area;

Residential development of two hundred fifty (250) or more dwelling units;

Recreational or public facility building or development that will generate fifteen thousand (15,000) or more additional vehicle trips per day; and

Infrastructure project having the installation of water lines of greater than six inches (6") in diameter, sewer lines greater than eight inches (8") in diameter or road improvements that provide or increase capacity by fifteen thousand (15,000) or more vehicles per day;

The applicability of these measures in the determination of regional impact projects will vary somewhat with the location of the proposed project, but should be used by the local government jurisdictions and/or the executive committee in making such determinations. Other quantitative measures as determined by the executive committee may be utilized in determining regional impact projects.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2018, ch. 634, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted the former definitions of “city, large” and “city, small” which read: “‘City, large’ means any city having a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more;“‘City, small’ means a city with a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000);” and inserted “public transportation, pedestrian and bicycle facilities,” following “streets and highways,” in the definition of “infrastructure”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 634, § 10. April 2, 2018.

64-7-103. Regional council — Composition — Term of office — Officers — Meetings.

The regional council shall be composed of and governed by the following:

County mayor of each county within the region;

The mayor of each municipality within the region;

The chief executive officer of any metropolitan government within the region;

One (1) representative from an agency or organization dealing with problems of economic development or promotion appointed by the county mayor, county executive, or metropolitan mayor from each of the regional council's member counties;

One (1) state senator selected from and by those senators whose districts are wholly or in part within the region;

One (1) state representative selected from and by those representatives whose districts are wholly or in part within the region; and

One (1) minority representative with knowledge of issues related to social equity and inclusion appointed by the county mayor, county executive, or metropolitan mayor from each of the regional council's member counties.

The terms of office of the regional council shall be as follows:

The state senator and representative shall serve on the council for two (2) years or until they leave the general assembly, whichever occurs first;

All members of the regional council who are elected officials shall serve for four (4) years or until they cease to occupy the elected position entitling them to membership, whichever occurs first;

All members of the regional council who are appointed by an elected official shall serve for four (4) years or until the expiration of the term of the official by whom such representative was appointed, whichever occurs first;

Members may be reappointed; and

A member ceases to belong to the regional council as soon as that member is no longer a member of the general assembly, the county mayor, the mayor, the chief executive officer of any metropolitan government or is an appointee of a person who no longer holds an elected position.

The officers of the regional council shall be as follows:

The officers of the regional council shall be a president, vice president and treasurer, who shall be elected annually from and by the regional council membership at the annual meeting, and a secretary who shall be the person serving as executive director of the regional council;

The officers shall serve a term of one (1) year;

Officers may be reelected; and

In the event of death or permanent disability of any of the aforementioned officers, the vacancy shall be filled by a vote of the executive board for the unexpired term of the officer for the office that was so vacated.

The regional council shall meet at least annually. The time and place of each meeting shall be determined by the executive board. An annual meeting shall be held for the purpose of electing officers, reviewing programs of the council, adopting of annual work program and budget, and other items that may be necessary to the operation of the regional council.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2006, ch. 609, § 1; 2018, ch. 634, §§ 3-7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a)(4) which read: “One (1) representative from a local agency in each county dealing with problems of industrial development or promotion appointed by the county mayor;”; substituted “One (1) minority representative with knowledge of issues related to social equity and inclusion appointed” for “One (1) minority member selected” at the beginning of (a)(7); added “, and a secretary who shall be the person serving as executive director of the regional council” at the end of (c)(1); substituted “the executive board” for “the executive committee” in (c)(4); and rewrote (d) which read: “The regional council shall meet annually. The time and place of the annual meeting shall be determined by the executive committee. The meeting shall be held in the fourth quarter of the federal fiscal year for the purpose of electing officers, reviewing programs of the council, adopting of annual work program and budget and other items that may be necessary to the operation of the regional council.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 634, § 10. April 2, 2018.

64-7-104. Executive board — Membership.

At the annual meeting, the regional council shall appoint an executive board, which shall be empowered to perform as the administrative body of the regional council and shall be empowered by the regional council to act in its stead.

The membership, officers, and term of office of the executive board shall be as set forth by the organizational bylaws.

In determining membership on the executive board, the regional council shall ensure representation from at least one (1) local government within each of the counties represented by the council.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2006, ch. 609, § 2; 2018, ch. 634, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) At the annual meeting, the regional council shall appoint an executive committee, which shall be empowered to perform as the administrative body of the regional council and shall be empowered by the regional council to act in its stead.“(b) The membership, officers and term of office of the executive committee shall be as follows:“(1) The three (3) persons who serve as officers of the regional council shall also serve in that same capacity for the executive committee;“(2) The two (2) representatives who serve on the regional council by virtue of their election to the general assembly;“(3) One (1) person selected by caucus from each county;“(A) Each county shall annually caucus in July and select a person to represent that county on the executive committee;“(B) The person selected must be chosen from among each county's representatives on the regional council;“(C) The membership eligibility is governed by the same rules as govern membership on the regional council; and“(D) The person selected shall serve for a period commencing the day of the annual meeting and ending no later than one (1) day prior to the next succeeding annual meeting;“(4) The minority members from the four (4) counties having the highest percentages of minority population as reported by the latest decennial census;“(5) Two (2) at-large representatives. One (1) shall be a mayor from a large city and the second the mayor from a small city and shall be appointed by the president; and“(6) A designated alternate may be named to serve in the absence of the selected representative.“(c) The executive committee shall meet monthly or by their vote call for special meetings and for deferring of meetings.“(d) Travel or per diem expenses may be paid to members of the executive committee, except to those members of the general assembly. The senator and representative shall receive no additional compensation, other than that which they may receive from the travel and per diem expenses from their respective houses of the general assembly for their service on the executive committee.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 634, § 10. April 2, 2018.

64-7-105. Uniform accounting system.

The regional council shall establish and maintain the uniform accounting system as developed by the comptroller of the treasury and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration in compliance with §13-14-108 as they relate to development districts.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

64-7-106. Financing.

It is the intent of the state to assist financially with the development of powers and functions of the regional council and for coordination of activities under this chapter; therefore, all funding presently provided to the Mid-Cumberland development district pursuant to §13-14-111 shall be provided to the regional council in the amount and in the manner provided for in §13-14-111 but shall not be limited to such funding.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The reference in this section to the Mid-Cumberland development district appears to be in error as §13-14-111 refers to the Upper Cumberland development district not the Mid-Cumberland development district.

64-7-107. Reporting and auditing.

The regional council shall prepare an annual report of its activities through June 30 of each year and submit a copy of the report to the governor, the general assembly and the commissioner of finance and administration.

The annual reports and all books of accounts and financial records of all funds received by grant, contract or otherwise from state, local or federal sources shall be subject to audit annually by the comptroller of the treasury. The audit may be performed by a licensed independent public accountant selected by the regional council and approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of any audit shall be paid by the regional council.

The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

All audits shall be completed as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year of the regional council. One (1) copy of each audit shall be furnished to each member of the regional council and the comptroller of the treasury. Copies of each audit shall also be made available to the press.

All audits performed by the internal staff of the regional council shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

64-7-108. Appropriating funds subject to approval — Matching funds required.

Funds appropriated to implement this chapter are subject to the approval of the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration.

Such approval shall be given only after review by the office of the governor of the annual work program developed by the regional council to assure that such program is in accordance with the development plans of the state.

These funds or portions thereof shall be paid only upon certification by the appropriate official of the regional council that matching local funds are available.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

64-7-109. Bond requirements.

Any regional council member, executive committee member, employee, officer or any other authorized person of the regional council who receives public funds, has authority to make expenditures from public funds or has access to any public funds is hereby required to give bond to be made payable to the state with such sureties as provided in this chapter. Such bond is to be conditioned in all cases in which a different condition is not prescribed upon the faithful discharge of any part thereof.

Such official bond shall be executed in the same form as that prescribed by § 8-19-101 for county and state officials and employees.

The amount of such required bond shall be a reasonable amount as determined by the amount of public funds received, expended or the amount to which such person had access during the previous fiscal year. In the case of a new office or position, the amount of such bond shall be reasonable to protect the public from breach of the condition of faithful discharge of the duties of such office or position, when the amount of public funds to be received, expended or to which that person will have access is considered.

All such official bonds shall be signed by authorized individuals of a corporate surety, and such corporation shall be duly licensed to do business in Tennessee as a surety.

The official bonds required under this section are hereby required to be transmitted to the comptroller of the treasury, be filed in comptroller of the treasury's office, and be receipted for by comptroller of the treasury.

No examination or certification of any such bonds is required in this section.

Provisions for bonds of all state and county officers set forth in title 8, chapter 19 shall also govern the bonds of all persons covered under this section, so far as title 8, chapter 19 are not inconsistent with this section.

The regional council shall pay the premiums for such bonds.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1.

64-7-110. Powers and duties.

The regional council has the following powers and duties:

To organize itself into a public body, elect its officers and adopt bylaws for purposes of carrying out functions authorized under this chapter;

To receive and expend funds from any sources for staffing, for research, planning, coordination, economic development, demonstration projects and other activities deemed necessary to promote the efficient, harmonious and economic development of the region, to receive grants from private foundations for purposes of research and for demonstration projects oriented to human, physical and natural resources utilization;

To contract with local, state and federal agencies and with consultants for services to be provided;

To prepare broad plans for the economic development of the region including, but not limited to, comprehensive land use and plans for physical development. Such plans shall be made with the purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted, efficient and economic development of the region that will, in accordance with present and future needs and resources, best promote the health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity and welfare of the citizens, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development and may include distribution of population, urbanization and the uses of land and resources for trade, industry, recreation, forestry, agriculture and tourism, that will tend to create conditions favorable to transportation, health, safety and otherwise promote the general welfare of the citizens, including the design and layout of industrial parks and feasibility studies for extension of utilities and services to areas deemed suitable for industrial development;

To cooperate and coordinate its activities with the local and state planning agencies and with development districts in developing and implementing plans for development;

To cooperate and coordinate its activities with the federal agencies responsible for developing natural, human and physical resources of the region and recommend projects that will enhance the development of all resources, to be carried out through existing governmental units or through a combination of these as applicable under state laws, including, but not limited to, the former Area Redevelopment Program and the former Economic Opportunity Act;

To cooperate with local and regional finance companies in assembling financial resources for commercial, industrial and other development;

To compile, prepare, publish and disseminate information about the economic resources of the region and about subareas;

To encourage and assist in the creation of private and semipublic, nonprofit organizations as needed and under existing laws of the state for carrying out specific projects and programs initiated under federal and state laws;

To enter into compacts and contractual arrangements with planning agencies of other adjoining or neighboring states for the purpose of preparing joint, comprehensive plans for development of a broader area or region. The regional council is hereby expressly authorized to expend funds for interstate planning, notwithstanding the fact that in doing so portions of such funds may be used for planning work outside of the state boundary;

To assume and perform all duties, powers, functions and obligations and is entitled to all rights under all contracts and agreements to which the Mid-Cumberland development district and the Mid-Cumberland council of governments is a party, including all funding and compensation due under the contracts and agreements, including, but not limited to, all state and federal grants and programs;

To contract with any other public agency singly or jointly to implement and administer public agency plans and to operate public agency programs and projects. Any other public agency has the power to contract with the regional council to implement and administer its plans and to operate its projects;

To discuss and make recommendations on matters involving intergovernmental cooperation brought to the attention of the regional council by the regional council members, nonmembers, local governments, units of the state and federal governments, quasi-governmental agencies or citizens of the region;

To initiate and/or request studies deemed necessary by the executive committee or the full regional council to further understanding of any matters or problems under consideration by the regional council;

To establish or designate any such committees, technical committees or advisory groups it deems necessary to assist the carrying out of its purposes and functions;

To accept contributions of funding and other assistance from:

Other public agencies; and

Private individuals, agencies, foundations, institutions, organizations, companies and/or corporations to further the planning or implementation functions described in this section and directed by the executive committee. The regional council shall not accept such private contributions when and if the contribution may be determined by the executive committee to be an effort to influence the regional council's actions, recommendations or plans;

To own or lease real and personal property that is necessary in order to fulfill the duties and responsibilities of the regional council as set forth in this chapter; and

To have and exercise other authority as deemed necessary to further and promote the orderly and economic development of the state.

The regional council has powers and duties that enable it to function as a catalyst in the implementation of projects that are planned by or for the regional council or are for the benefit of a portion of the member local governmental units of the regional council. The regional council as a public agency and any one (1) or more local governments within the region as public agencies may join together to exercise their powers in the following manner:

Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any public agency of any other state or the United States to the extent that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting jointly with any public agency may exercise or enjoy all the powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a public agency. The authority for joint or cooperative action of political subdivisions applies only to such powers, privileges or authority vested in their governing bodies, and no joint or cooperative agreement shall be entered into affecting or relating to the constitutional or statutory powers, privileges or authority of officers of political subdivisions or of agencies of political subdivisions having powers granted by statute independent of the governing body;

Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to this chapter. Appropriate action of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies by resolution or otherwise pursuant to law is necessary before any such agreement may enter into force;

Any such agreement shall specify the following:

Its duration;

The precise organization, composition and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity or entities created thereby, which may include, but not be limited to, a nonprofit corporation, together with the powers delegated thereto;

Its purpose or purposes;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget for the undertaking;

The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination; and

Any other necessary and proper matters;

In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity or entities to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement shall, in addition to subdivisions (b)(3)(A)-(F), contain the following:

Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking and, in the case of a joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be represented; and

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking;

No agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall relieve any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law, except that to the extent of actual and timely performance of the agreement by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity or entities created by an agreement made hereunder, those performances may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility;

Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided by law;

In the event that an agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter is between or among one (1) or more public agencies of this state and one (1) or more public agencies of another state or of the United States, the agreement shall have the status of an interstate compact, but in any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, the public agencies party thereto shall be real parties in interest and the state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liability that it may incur by reason of being joined as a party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of performance or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state;

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter deals in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by the state officer or agency as to all matters within the state officer's or agency's jurisdiction;

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give or otherwise supply the administrative joint board or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing such personnel or services for the undertaking as may be within its legal power to furnish;

Any one (1) or more public agencies may contract with any one (1) or more public agencies to perform any governmental service, activity or undertaking that each public agency entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform; provided, that such contract shall be authorized by the governing body of each party to the contract. Such contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, objectives and responsibilities of the contracting parties. Contracts entered into pursuant to this section need to conform to the requirements set forth in this chapter for contracts for joint undertakings; and

Nothing in this chapter prohibits any public agency from contracting with other public agencies under existing statutory or charter authority.

The regional planning function of the regional council shall be broadly interpreted from the functions in subsections (a) and (b) and shall also include specifically the following functions:

Developing, amending and redrafting regional goals, strategies, policies, standards and plans for the region, which goals, strategies, standards and plans may consist of, but are not limited to, a combination of the following elements: land use, transportation, water, sewer, solid waste, recreation and open space, housing and environmental concerns;

Reviewing and making recommendations on all comprehensive or general plans or major elements thereof developed by the local governments after the enactment of these provisions to ensure compatibility and consistency with regional goals, strategies, policies, standards and plans adopted by the regional council, which plans by the local governments include, but are not limited to, existing and future land use, functional transportation plan, public facilities plan to include water and sewer plans, capital improvements programs and budgets;

Reviewing all grant and loan requests from local governments or other organizations or agencies within the jurisdiction of the local governments to the state and federal governments and submitting recommendations and comments on these requests where appropriate as authorized previously by executive order of the governor;

Reviewing all regional impact projects;

Planning for any regional cooperative infrastructure projects and acting as a catalyst in the implementation of these projects by planning for these projects, assisting in the structuring of financing and financial arrangements and assisting in the formation of institutional arrangements for the construction and operation of these facilities; and

Calling for public hearings for the purpose of citizen participation on any of the above within the discretion of the executive committee, to resolve conflict between and among entities of local governments on any of the above, or to resolve conflicts between the regional council and any local government affected by a regional goal, policy, standard and plan.

The review processes as outlined in subdivisions (c)(2) and (3) are mandatory reviews, and the executive committee shall issue comments and/or recommendations to the local, state or federal governments as to the findings of these reviews. The comments and/or recommendations of the executive committee shall not be binding on these governmental units, but shall be viewed as advisory as are those of other reviewing bodies, such as local planning commissions. Review by the executive committee of items in subdivisions (c)(2) and (3) shall be based on the regional council's adopted regional goals, strategies, policies, standards and plans.

The review process as outlined in subdivision (c)(4) may be initiated by any of the following means:

A mayor or county mayor and/or legislative body whose city or county will be impacted by the project can request the review in accordance with procedures established by the executive committee;

The planning staff of any jurisdiction in which the project is proposed to be located and/or the planning commission that has jurisdiction over the review, recommendation or approval of the project;

The executive committee may request review of the proposed project; or

Any agency, commission or department of the state of Tennessee, adjoining state or federal government may request the regional council to review the project.

The executive committee's review, comments and/or recommendations regarding a regional impact project will be based on compatibility and consistency with regional goals, strategies, policies and plans, and it will also be based on an analysis of the probable impacts of the regional impact project. The impact analysis is designed to be an aid and an information source for mayors, county mayors, planning staffs, local planning commissions, city councils, and boards of county commissioners, state and federal agencies, commissions and departments in their evaluations of a project and an aid for adjacent jurisdictions to coordinate and plan for impacts that are created by these projects.

The review and recommendations process as outlined in subdivisions (c)(3) and (4) shall be completed by the executive committee within a maximum of thirty (30) days after its submission to the executive committee. Projects, grants and loan applications will be placed on the executive committee's next available agenda when received by the executive committee if the project, grant or loan application is received within fifteen (15) days of the meeting. If the project, grant or loan application is received by the executive committee less than fifteen (15) days prior to its next meeting, it will be placed on the agenda of the next subsequent meeting. If the executive committee fails to respond to a project, grant or loan application by failing to make a review and recommendation or fails to call for a public hearing within the thirty (30) days after its submittal, it is deemed acceptable or of no regional impact. The thirty-day review period may be extended, if the executive committee finds it is appropriate to do so in the public interest in order to conduct a public hearing. The review and recommendation of the executive committee on regional impact projects is an advisory function only. The ability to approve, modify or disapprove a regional impact project is wholly and completely within the jurisdiction of the local government in which the project is proposed to be located.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 59, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The former Federal Economic Opportunity Act was codified as 42 U.S.C. § 2701 et seq.

The former Area Redevelopment Act was codified as 15 U.S.C. § 461, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1464, 2501 et seq.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Housing authorities, title 13, ch. 20.

64-7-111. Limitations on powers and duties of regional council.

The following are limitations on the powers and duties of the regional council:

All plans shall be advisory only unless provided otherwise by federal law pertaining to the development of regional plans and programs;

No authority is hereby granted to enact zoning ordinances or subdivision standards;

No authority is hereby granted such that would supplant or in any way interfere or supersede the planning and development authority granted cities and counties under other applicable state statutes;

Plans prepared under this part must reflect goals and objectives for harmonious development of the region and, in the case of highways, must be in accordance and coordinated with plans of the department of transportation and of the [former] state planning office;

Plans prepared under this chapter shall be transmitted to all governmental bodies in the region, and these may be adopted as their own for purposes of planning and development;

No authority is hereby granted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain;

No authority is hereby granted to regulate the agricultural or other use of land; and

No votes may be cast by proxy, and only duly appointed members of the regional council may vote.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2018, ch. 634, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added “unless provided otherwise by federal law pertaining to the development of regional plans and programs” at the end of (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 634, § 10. April 2, 2018.